dict/builddict/names.dic
ترب/ADACABAACDCCCBCAJALBLA
حواشي/ADACABAAKAJA
حملة/ADACABAACDCCCBCAHDHCHBHAJALBLA
خرص/ADACABAACDCCCBCAJALBLA
روضة/ADACABAACDCCCBCAHDHCHBHAJALBLA
شيمة/ADACABAACDCCCBCAJALBLA
صلعة/ADACABAACDCCCBCAHDHCHBHAJALBLA
مطاهي/ADACABAAKAJA
غرارة/ADACABAACDCCCBCAJALBLA
كسور/ADACABAAJALBLA
منافي/ADACABAAKAJA
منار/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHAJALBLA
إحباس/ADACABAACDCCCBCAHDHCHBHAJALBLA
استضاءة/ADACABAACDCCCBCAHDHCHBHAJALBLA
انتشال/ADACABAACDCCCBCAHDHCHBHAJALBLA
تحني/ADACABAACDCCCBCAHDHCHBHAKAJA
تصافي/ADACABAACDCCCBCAHDHCHBHAKAJA
تفسح/ADACABAACDCCCBCAHDHCHBHAJALBLA
تكسي/ADACABAACDCCCBCAHDHCHBHAKAJA
تلوه/ADACABAACDCCCBCAHDHCHBHAJALBLA
تهادي/ADACABAACDCCCBCAHDHCHBHAKAJA
ترخيص/ADACABAACDCCCBCAHDHCHBHAJALBLA
تصويت/ADACABAACDCCCBCAHDHCHBHAJALBLA
تقويم/ADACABAACDCCCBCAHDHCHBHAJALBLA
توفيق/ADACABAACDCCCBCAHDHCHBHAJALBLA
بالي/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHAKAJA
متلف/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHAIDICIBIAJADEIE
مدرك/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHAIDICIBIAJADEIE
مستغفر/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHAIDICIBIAJADEIE
مستند/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHAIDICIBIAJA
مطفئ/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHAIDICIBIAJADEIE
مطل/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHAIDICIBIAJA
مقيم/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHAIDICIBIAJADEIE
منتفع/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHAIDICIBIAJADEIE
منقلب/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHAIDICIBIAJA
مبدل/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHAIDICIBIAJADEIE
متبني/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHAIDICIBIAKAJADEIE
متقاعس/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHAIDICIBIAJA
متقبل/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHAIDICIBIAJADEIE
حائز/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHAIDICIBIAJADEIE
خائن/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHAIDICIBIAJADEIE
دائم/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHAIDICIBIAJA
مدمر/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHAIDICIBIAJADEIE
رواشي/ADACABAAKAJA
راهن/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHAIDICIBIAJADEIE
سافح/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHAIDICIBIAJADEIE
شاغب/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHAIDICIBIAJA
شركة/ADACABAAJA
مشنع/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHAIDICIBIAJADEIE
صاغر/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHAIDICIBIAJA
معزي/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHAIDICIBIAKAJADEIE
عافي/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHAIDICIBIAKAJA
قارض/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHAIDICIBIAJADEIE
قانت/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHAIDICIBIAJA
لامح/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHAIDICIBIAJADEIE
ناقد/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHAIDICIBIAJADEIE
ناهي/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHAIDICIBIAKAJADEIE
هادف/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHAIDICIBIAJA
معتقل/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHAIDICIBIAJADEIE
معتصم/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHAJA
مغتال/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHAIDICIBIAJA
محزون/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHAIDICIBIAJA
مخروق/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHAJAIF
معظم/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHAIDICIBIAJA
مفتول/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHAJAIF
مكتوم/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHAJAIF
مكرس/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHAJAIF
مكور/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHAJAIF
ممزوج/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHAJAIF
منقوط/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHAJAIF
منوع/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHAJAIF
موثوق/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHAJAIF
فهام/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHAIDICIBIAJA
طماع/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHAIDICIBIAJA
ضجر/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHAIDICIBIAJA
عميق/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHAJAIF
حصين/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHAJAIF
زهيد/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHAIDICIBIAJA
سميك/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHAJAIF
قشيب/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHAJAIF
نظيم/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHAJAIF
رهيب/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHAJAIF
ركيب/ADACABAAJA
مرير/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHAJAIF
سبي/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHAJAIG
شجي/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHAJAIG
شقي/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHAJAIG
صفي/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHAJAIG
علي/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHANDNCNBNAJA
بهي/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHAJAIG
أطول/ADACABAACDCCCBCAIDICIBIA
شيق/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHAJAIF
طامث/ADACABAACDCCCBCAHDHCHBHAJA
قربان/ADACABAACDCCCBCAHDHCHBHAJA
تنقيس/ADACABAACDCCCBCAHDHCHBHAJA
تهدير/ADACABAACDCCCBCAHDHCHBHAJA
هجيج/ADACABAACDCCCBCAHDHCHBHAJA
نعير/ADACABAACDCCCBCAHDHCHBHAJA
زعنفة/ADACABAACDCCCBCAHDHCHBHAJA
سابت/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHAIDICIBIAJA
قافش/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHAIDICIBIAJA
لامج/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHAIDICIBIAJA
متخيم/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHAIDICIBIAJA
متناظر/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHAIDICIBIAJA
منقعر/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHAIDICIBIAJA
متخلل/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHAJA
مجترع/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHAIDICIBIAJA
مجرع/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHAIDICIBIAJA
سام/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHAIDICIBIAJA
ضاني/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHAIDICIBIAKAJA
متغدي/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHAIDICIBIAKAJA
محتمي/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHAIDICIBIAKAJA
ملتوي/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHAIDICIBIAKAJA
موشي/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHAIDICIBIAKAJA
مسجي/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHAIDICIBIAKAJA
متبني/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHAIDICIBIAKAJA
ذامي/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHAKAJA
ناعي/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHAIDICIBIAKAJA
مأثور/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHAJA
بدين/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHAIDICIBIAJADEIE
حديث/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHAIDICIBIAJADEIE
سميك/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHAJAIFDEIE
صغير/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHAIDICIBIAJADEIE
ضنك/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHAJAIFDEIE
غزير/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHAJAIFDEIE
فسيح/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHAJAIFDEIE
مكين/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHAJAIFDEIE
وثيق/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHAJAIFDEIE
سري/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHAJAIG
طري/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHAJAIG
مستشارية/ADACABAACDCCCBCAHDHCHBHAJA
تناقش/ADACABAACDCCCBCAHDHCHBHALBLAJA
